Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 422D.6, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . i. (1) The salaries or wages of emergency medical care providers providing emergency medical services. (2) As used in this paragraph, âemergency medical care providerâ and âemergency medical servicesâ mean the same as defined in section 147A.1. Senate File 42, p. 2 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 42, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor